Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-268
Transmission services; limitations.

No common carrier shall provide transmission services for any pay-per-call service which employs broadcast advertising that generates the audible tones necessary to complete a call to a pay-per-call service.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1109;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 130.